Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 42 Checks and Other Instruments — Dishonor

6-42-1.
Notice of dishonor.

When a check, draft, or other instrument has been dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment by any bank or other financial institution and has not been paid within ten (10) days, the holder to whom the check, draft, or other instrument was issued may send a notice of dishonor to the maker or drawer as provided in §

6-42-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 93, § 1.

6-42-2.
Term of notes — Form of notice of dishonor.

A notice of dishonor sent by a holder to a maker or drawer pursuant to §

6-42-1

shall substantially comply with the following form:

The notice provided for in subsection (a) shall be sent certified mail, return receipt requested, or by regular mail when such mailing is supported by an affidavit of service by mail.

NOTICE OF DISHONORED CHECK DATE NAME OF ISSUER STREET ADDRESS CITY AND STATE You are according to law hereby notified that a check or instrument numbered and dated 20, drawn on (bank or other financial institution) of , in the amount of has been returned unpaid with the notation that the payment has been refused because of rule. Within thirty (30) days from the mailing of this notice, you must pay or tender to (holder) at sufficient money to pay the check (address of holder) draft or instrument in full. If payment of the above amount is not made within thirty (30) days of the mailing of this notice of dishonor, you may be liable under , in addition to the amount of the check, draft, or other instrument, and a collection fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00), for an amount of up to three (3) times the amount of the check, draft, or other instrument, but in no case less than two hundred dollars ($200) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). § 6-42-3 (signature of holder)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 29.

6-42-3.
Cause of action — Damages.

If a check, draft, or other instrument has not been paid within thirty (30) days after the holder has sent a notice of dishonor to the maker or drawer of a check, draft, or other instrument that has been dishonored, pursuant to §§

6-42-1

and

6-42-2

, the holder may seek the damages provided under this section in the district court and may at the holder’s election be in accordance with the procedure for small claims set forth in chapter 16 of title 10.

The maker or drawer of a dishonored check or other instrument who fails to pay the amount demanded within thirty (30) days of the mailing of the notice of dishonor shall be liable to the holder for:

The amount of the check or other instrument;

A collection fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

An amount equal to three (3) times the amount of the check or instrument, but in no case less than two hundred dollars ($200) and in no case more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 93, § 1.

6-42-4.
Defenses to action.

It shall be a defense to any action commenced by the holder of a dishonored check or other instrument under §

6-42-3

that:

The dishonor of the check or other instrument was due to a justifiable stop payment order or to the attachment of the account; or

Within thirty (30) days from the mailing of the notice of dishonor, the maker or drawer has paid to the holder the full amount of the check or other instrument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 93, § 1.